Utah statutes.
79-3-509.   Curriculum and materials for the training of volunteers who assist paleontologists.

(1)  The survey shall develop a curriculum and materials for the training of volunteers who assist paleontologists in the field and laboratory.

(2)  The director shall appoint a qualified survey employee to develop the curriculum and materials under this section.

(3)  The survey may request input and assistance from any interested organization in developing the curriculum and materials.

(4)  The survey may collect fees to cover the costs of the materials and updating of the curriculum.

